New Jersey, session 222, S4078.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the New Jersey Dialysis Patient Support Person Accommodation Act. 2.  a.  A dialysis center licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) shall permit a patient receiving dialysis treatment to be accompanied by a designated support person. b.  The designated support person may assist the patient with communication, mobility, and decision-making, as necessary to facilitate the patients care and treatment. 3.  a.  A dialysis center may establish and implement reasonable health, safety, and infection control measures governing the presence of support persons, provided that such measures do not unnecessarily restrict or deny access to a support person as permitted under section 2 of this act. b.  Each dialysis center shall develop and maintain written policies concerning support person access.  The policies shall be: (1) posted in a visible location within the facility; and (2) made available to patients, families, and members of the public upon request. c.  All pertinent dialysis center staff shall receive training on the requirements of this act and the facilitys policies concerning support person access. 4.  a.  The Department of Health shall oversee compliance with the provisions of this act and shall investigate complaints alleging a violation. b.  A patient who is denied access to a designated support person may file a complaint with the Department of Health. c.  A dialysis center that fails to comply with the provisions of this act shall be subject to penalties, fines, or corrective action orders, as determined by the Department of Health. 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.